Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 1. The Department and the Commissioner.
§ 37.2-314.
Background check required.

As a condition of employment, the Department shall require any applicant who (i) accepts a position of employment at a state facility and was not employed by that state facility prior to July 1, 1996, or (ii) accepts a position with the Department that receives, monitors, or disburses funds of the Commonwealth and was not employed by the Department prior to July 1, 1996, to submit to fingerprinting and provide personal descriptive information to be forwarded along with the applicant’s fingerprints through the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) for the purpose of obtaining national criminal history record information regarding the applicant.

For purposes of clause (i) of subsection A, the Department shall not hire for compensated employment persons who have been convicted of (i) any offense set forth in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

or (ii) any offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

(a) in the five years prior to the application date for employment or (b) if such person continues on probation or parole or has failed to pay required court costs for such offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B, the Department may hire for compensated employment at an adult substance abuse or adult mental health treatment program a person who was convicted of any violation of §

18.2-51.3

; any misdemeanor violation of §

18.2-56

or

18.2-56.1

or subsection A of §

18.2-57

; any first offense misdemeanor violation of §

18.2-57

.2; any violation of §

18.2-60

,

18.2-89

,

18.2-92

, or

18.2-94

; any misdemeanor violation of §

18.2-282

,

18.2-346

, or

18.2-346.01

; any offense set forth in clause (iii) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

, except an offense pursuant to subsection H1 or H2 of §

18.2-248

; or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, if the Department determines, based upon a screening assessment, that the criminal behavior was substantially related to the applicant’s substance abuse or mental illness and that the person has been successfully rehabilitated and is not a risk to individuals receiving services based on his criminal history background and his substance abuse or mental illness history.

The Department and a screening contractor designated by the Department shall screen applicants who meet the criteria set forth in subsection C to assess whether the applicants have been rehabilitated successfully and are not a risk to individuals receiving services based on their criminal history backgrounds and substance abuse or mental illness histories. To be eligible for such screening, the applicant shall have completed all prison or jail terms; shall not be under probation or parole supervision; shall have no pending charges in any locality; shall have paid all fines, restitution, and court costs for any prior convictions; and shall have been free of parole or probation for at least five years for all convictions. In addition to any supplementary information the Department or screening contractor may require or the applicant may wish to present, the applicant shall provide to the screening contractor a statement from his most recent probation or parole officer, if any, outlining his period of supervision and a copy of any pre-sentencing or post-sentencing report in connection with the felony conviction. The cost of this screening shall be paid by the applicant, unless the Department decides to pay the cost.

The Central Criminal Records Exchange, upon receipt of an applicant’s record or notification that no record exists, shall submit a report to the state facility or to the Department. If an applicant is denied employment because of information appearing on his criminal history record and the applicant disputes the information upon which the denial was based, the Central Criminal Records Exchange shall, upon written request, furnish to the applicant the procedures for obtaining a copy of the criminal history record from the FBI. The information provided to the state facility or Department shall not be disseminated except as provided in this section.

Those applicants listed in clause (i) of subsection A also shall provide to the state facility or Department a copy of information from the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

on any investigation of child abuse or neglect undertaken on them.

The Board may adopt regulations to comply with the provisions of this section. Copies of any information received by the state facility or Department pursuant to this section shall be available to the Department and to the applicable state facility but shall not be disseminated further, except as permitted by state or federal law. The cost of obtaining the criminal history record and the central registry information shall be borne by the applicant, unless the Department or state facility decides to pay the cost.

History.

1996, cc. 881, 927, § 37.1-20.3; 1999, c. 685; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 383, 476, 507; 2017, c. 809; 2020, c. 1092; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 188.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 383, in subsection B, inserted “a felony violation of a protective order as set out in § 16.1-253.2,” “or B” preceding “of §

18.2-47

,” and “a felony violation of a protective order as set out in §

18.2-60.4

.”

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “applicant” for “individual” near the beginning, and at the end, of subsection A; in subsection C, substituted “applicant’s” for “individual’s” in the first sentence and “applicant” for “individual” in the second sentence; and in subsection D, substituted “Those applicants” for “Those individuals” at the beginning.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 809 rewrote the first paragraph in subsection B, which formerly listed specific criminal offenses.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1092, added subsections C and D and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 188, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “18.2-346, or

18.2-346.01

” for “or

18.2-346

” in subsection C.

§ 37.2-314.1.
Developmental Disabilities Mortality Review Committee; duties; membership; confidentiality; report; penalty.

There is hereby created the Developmental Disabilities Mortality Review Committee (the Committee), which shall develop and implement procedures to ensure that deaths of persons with developmental disabilities receiving services from a provider licensed by the Department or in a training center or other state facility are reviewed and analyzed in a systematic way. The Committee shall review each death of a person with a developmental disability who was receiving services from a provider licensed by the Department or in a training center or other state facility at the time of his death. The Committee shall develop and revise as necessary operating procedures for the review of deaths of such persons, including identification of cases to be reviewed and procedures for coordinating among the agencies and professionals involved in such review. Such operating procedures shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) pursuant to subdivision B 17 of §

2.2-4002

.

The Committee shall consist of the following persons or their designees: the Chief Clinical Officer appointed by the Commissioner; the Clinical Manager, Program Coordinator and Clinical Reviewer of the Department’s Mortality Review Team; the Senior Director of Quality Improvement of the Department; an employee of the Department with experience related to quality improvement; an employee of the Department with relevant programmatic or operational experience; a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy in the Commonwealth; a person licensed to practice as a registered nurse in the Commonwealth; and a person with experience in conducting mortality reviews who is not employed by or otherwise affiliated with the Department. The Chief Clinical Officer and the Clinical Manager of the Department’s Mortality Review Team shall serve as co-chairs of the Committee. The co-chairs of the committee or the Commissioner may appoint such additional members of the Committee as may be needed to complete developmental disability mortality reviews pursuant to this section.Members of the Committee shall serve such terms as may be determined by the Commissioner.

Upon the request of the Chief Clinical Officer in his capacity as a co-chair of the Committee, information and records regarding an individual whose death is being reviewed by the Committee, including (i) any report of the circumstances of the death maintained by any state or local law-enforcement agency or the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner and (ii) information or records about the person maintained by any facility, hospital, nursing home, or health care provider that provided services to the individual, any social services agency that provided services to the individual, or any court shall be provided to the Chief Clinical Officer or his designee. Any presentence report prepared pursuant to §

19.2-299

for any person convicted of a crime that may have led to the death of the person whose death is the subject of review by the Committee shall be made available to the Chief Clinical Officer or his designee for inspection. In addition, the Chief Clinical Officer or his designee may inspect and copy from any health care provider in the Commonwealth, on behalf of the Committee, any health or mental health record of the individual, without authorization.

All information obtained or generated by the Committee or on behalf of the Committee regarding a review shall be confidential and excluded from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) pursuant to subdivision 7 of §

2.2-3705.5

. Such information shall not be subject to subpoena or discovery or be admissible in any civil or criminal proceeding. If available from other sources, however, such information and records shall not be immune from subpoena, discovery, or introduction into evidence when obtained through such other sources solely because the information and records were presented to the Committee during a review pursuant to this section. The Committee shall compile all requested information collected for a clinical review. The findings of the Committee may be disclosed or published in statistical or other form but shall not identify any individuals.The portions of meetings in which individual death cases are discussed by the Committee shall be closed pursuant to subdivision A 21 of §

2.2-3711

. In addition to the requirements of §

2.2-3712

, all members of the Committee and other persons attending closed meetings of the Committee, including any persons presenting information or records on specific deaths, shall sign an agreement to maintain the confidentiality of the information, records, discussions, and opinions disclosed during meetings at which the Committee reviews a specific death. No member of the Committee or other person who participates in a review shall be required to make any statement regarding the review or any information collected during the review. Violations of this subsection are punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor.

Upon notification of the death of a person with a developmental disability who was receiving services from a provider licensed by the Department or in a training center or other state facility, any state or local government agency or facility that provided services to the person or maintained records on the person or the person’s family shall retain the records for 12 months after the date of the death.

The Committee shall report its activities annually to the Governor and the General Assembly by December 1. Such report shall include statistical and other data on the deaths of persons with a developmental disability who were receiving services from a provider licensed by the Department or in a training center or other state facility at the time of their death and recommendations developed by the Committee to address the conditions that led to such deaths. Any statistical compilations prepared by the Committee shall be public record and shall not contain any personally identifying information.

History.

2020, c. 851.

§ 37.2-314.2.
Problem Gambling Treatment and Support Fund.

As used in this section:“Compulsive gambling” means persistent and recurrent problem gambling behavior leading to clinically significant impairment or distress, as indicated by an individual exhibiting four or more of the criteria as defined by the Diagnostic Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders in a 12-month period and where the behavior is not better explained by a manic episode.“Problem gambling” means a gambling behavior that causes disruptions in any major area of life, including the psychological, social, or vocational areas of life, but does not fulfill the criteria for diagnosis as a gambling disorder.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Problem Gambling Treatment and Support Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All revenue accruing to the Fund pursuant to subsection A of §

58.1-4038

and moneys required to be deposited into the Fund pursuant to Chapter 41 (§

58.1-4100

et seq.) of Title 58.1 shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of (i) providing counseling and other support services for compulsive and problem gamblers, (ii) developing and implementing compulsive and problem gambling treatment and prevention programs, and (iii) providing grants to support organizations that provide assistance to compulsive and problem gamblers. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Commissioner.

History.

2020, c. 1197, 1218, 1248, 1256, §

37.2-314.1

.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2020 acts having been §

37.2-314.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1197 and 1248, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1197 and 1248, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Lottery Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1218 and 1256, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Lottery Board (the Board) shall promulgate regulations implementing the provisions of this act. The Board’s initial adoption of regulations shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulations prior to adoption. The Board shall complete work on such regulations no later than September 15, 2020.”

§ 37.2-314.3.
Powers and duties of the Department related to supported decision-making agreements; report.

As used in this section:“Principal” means an adult with an intellectual or developmental disability who seeks to enter or has entered into a supported decision-making agreement with a supporter.“Supported decision-making agreement” means an agreement between a principal and a supporter that sets out the specific terms of support to be provided by the supporter, including (i) helping the principal monitor and manage his medical, financial, and other affairs; (ii) assisting the principal in accessing, obtaining, and understanding information relevant to decisions regarding his affairs; (iii) assisting the principal in understanding information, options, responsibilities, and consequences of decisions; and (iv) ascertaining the wishes and decisions of the principal regarding his affairs, assisting in communicating such wishes and decisions to other persons, and advocating to ensure the wishes and decisions of the principal are implemented.“Supporter” means a person who has entered into a supported decision-making agreement with a principal.

The Department shall develop and implement a program to educate individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, their families, and others regarding the availability of supported decision-making agreements, the process by which an individual with an intellectual or developmental disability may enter into a supported decision-making agreement with a supporter, and the rights and responsibilities of principals and supporters who are parties to a supported decision-making agreement. Such program shall include (i) specific training opportunities for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities and who seek to enter into supported decision-making agreements, individuals interested in serving as supporters pursuant to supported decision-making agreements, family members of principals and individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities who seek to enter into supported decision-making agreements, and members of the medical, legal, and financial professions and other individuals who provide services to individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities who may enter into supported decision-making agreements and (ii) development of model supported decision-making agreements for individuals who seek to enter into supported decision-making agreements. Such program shall also include development of information about and protocols for preventing, identifying, and addressing abuse and exploitation of individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities who enter into supported decision-making agreements.

The Department shall collect data regarding the utilization of supported decision-making agreements in the Commonwealth to guide the development of policies and programs to enhance the use of supported decision-making agreements and shall report such information together with recommendations to enhance the utilization of supported decision-making agreements annually to the Governor and the General Assembly by November 1.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 232.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.